test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hammas14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hammas: # Noun (14) hammas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hammas+N+Sg+Nom: hammas
     hammas+N+Sg+Gen: hamba
     hammas+N+Sg+Par: hammast
     hammas+N+Sg+Ill: hambahe
     hammas+N+Pl+Gen: [hambidõ, hammastõ]
     hammas+N+Pl+Par: hambit
     hammas+N+Pl+Ill: [hambihe, hammastõhe]
     hammas+N+Pl+All: [hambilõ, hammastõlõ]

     hammas+N+Sg+Nom: hammas
     hammas+N+Sg+Gen: hamba
     hammas+N+Sg+Par: hammast
     hammas+N+Sg+Ill: [hambahe, hambadõ]
     hammas+N+Sg+Ine: [hamban, hambah, hambahn]
     hammas+N+Sg+Ela: hambast
     hammas+N+Sg+All: hambalõ
     hammas+N+Sg+Ade: hambal
     hammas+N+Sg+Abl: hambalt
     hammas+N+Sg+Tra: hambas
     hammas+N+Sg+Ter: hambaniq
     hammas+N+Sg+Abe: hambaldaq
     hammas+N+Sg+Com: hambagaq
     hammas+N+Pl+Nom: hambaq
     hammas+N+Pl+Gen: [hambidõ, hammastõ]
     hammas+N+Pl+Par: [hambit, hambiid]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ill: [hambiihe, hambihe, hambiidõ, hambidõ, hammastõhe]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ine: [hambiihn, hambihn, hambiin, hambin, hammastõhn, hammastõn]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ela: [hambiist, hambist, hammastõst]
     hammas+N+Pl+All: [hambiilõ, hambilõ, hammastõle]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ade: [hambiil, hambil, hammastõl]
     hammas+N+Pl+Abl: [hambiilt, hambilt, hammastõlt]
     hammas+N+Pl+Tra: [hambiis, hambis, hammastõs]
     hammas+N+Pl+Ter: [hambiiniq, hambiniq, hammastõniq]
     hammas+N+Pl+Abe: [hambiildaq, hambildaq, hammastõldaq]
     hammas+N+Pl+Com: [hambiidõgaq, hambidõgaq, hammastõgaq]
